Utah statutes.
77-32a-9.   Costs imposed on corporation or association -- Duty to pay -- Contempt.

When costs are imposed on a corporation or unincorporated association, it is the duty of the person authorized to make disbursement from the assets of the corporation or association to pay the costs from those assets, and his failure to do so may be held to be contempt unless he makes the showing required in Section 77-32a-8 of this act.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

